District of Columbia statutes.
38-2913

Services.

Beginning in Fiscal Year 2017, services provided by District of Columbia government agencies to public schools shall be provided on an equal basis to the District of Columbia Public Schools and public charter schools. Any services that are funded apart from the Uniform per Student Funding Formula shall not also be funded by the Uniform Per Student Funding Formula.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-207, § 115
as added Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 4062, 57 DCR 6242
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-370, § 402(d), 58 DCR 1008
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 4072, 59 DCR 8025
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 4102, 60 DCR 12472
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 4062, 61 DCR 9990
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 4002(c), 62 DCR 10905
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4002(c) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4062 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4062 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4062 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4102 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4102 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 402(d) of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).
For temporary (90 day) additions, see § 4062 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “Fiscal Year 2017” for “fiscal year 2016” in the first sentence.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 substituted “Fiscal Year 2016” for “fiscal year 2015” in the first sentence.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 substituted “fiscal year 2015” for “fiscal year 2014” in the first sentence.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 substituted “fiscal year 2014” for “fiscal year 2013” in the first sentence.
D.C. Law 18-370 substituted “2013” for “2012”.

Section 4101 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle J of Title IV of the act may be cited as the “Education Funding Formula Equity Amendment Act of 2013”.

Short title: Section 4061 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle G of title IV of the act may be cited as the “Public Education Finance Reform Commission Establishment Amendment Act of 2010”.